North Carolina statutes. Chapter 57D. North Carolina Limited Liability Company Act.
Part 2. Filing Documents.

§ 57D-1-20.
Filing requirements.

A document required or permitted by this Chapter to be filed by the Secretary of State must be filed as provided in Chapter 55D of the General Statutes.

A document submitted on behalf of a limited liability company must be executed by one of the following:

A manager or other company official.

If the document is the articles of organization, a person acting in the capacity of an organizer or a member as provided in G.S. 57D-2-21(a)(2).

If the LLC has never had any members, an organizer.

If the LLC is in the hands of a receiver, trustee, or other court-appointed fiduciary, by that fiduciary.

History.

2013-157, s. 2.

§ 57D-1-21.
Forms.

The Secretary of State may promulgate and furnish on request forms for the following:

An application for a certificate of existence.

A foreign LLC’s application for a certificate of authority to transact business in this State.

A foreign LLC’s application for a certificate of withdrawal.

If the Secretary of State so requires, use of the forms listed in subsection (a) of this section is mandatory.

The Secretary of State may promulgate and furnish on request forms for other documents required or permitted to be filed by this Chapter, but their use is not mandatory.

History.

2013-157, s. 2.

§ 57D-1-22.
Filing, service, and copying fees.

The Secretary of State shall collect the following fees when the documents described in this subsection are delivered to the Secretary of State for filing:Document Fee

Articles of organization $125.00

Application for reserved name 10.00

Notice of transfer of reserved name 10.00

Application for registered name 10.00

Application for renewal of registered name 10.00

Limited liability company’s statement of change of registeredagent or registered office or both 5.00

Agent’s statement of change of registered office for each affectedlimited liability company 5.00

Agent’s statement of resignation No fee

Designation of registered agent or registered office or both 5.00

Amendment of articles of organization 50.00

Restated articles of organization without amendmentof articles 10.00

Restated articles of organization with amendment of articles 50.00

Articles of conversion (other than articles of conversionincluded as part of another document 50.00

Articles of merger 50.00

Articles of dissolution 30.00

Cancellation of articles of dissolution 10.00

Certificate of administrative dissolution No fee

Application for reinstatement following administrativedissolution 100.00

Certificate of reinstatement No fee

Certificate of judicial dissolution No fee

Application for certificate of authority 250.00

Application for amended certificate of authority 50.00

Application for certificate of withdrawal 10.00

Certificate of revocation of authority to transact business No fee

Articles of correction 10.00

Application for certificate of existence orauthorization (paper) 15.00

Application for certificate of existence orauthorization (electronic) 10.00

Annual report 200.00

Any other document required or permitted to be filedby this Chapter 10.00

The Secretary of State shall collect a fee of ten dollars ($10.00) each time process is served on the Secretary of State under this Chapter. The party to a proceeding causing service of process is entitled to recover this fee as costs if the party prevails in the proceeding.

The Secretary of State shall collect the following fees for copying and certifying a copy of any filed document relating to a limited liability company:

One dollar ($1.00) a page for copying.

Fifteen dollars ($15.00) for a paper certificate.

Ten dollars ($10.00) for an electronic certificate.

History.

2013-157, s. 2.

§ 57D-1-23.
Execution by judicial act.

Any person who is adversely affected by the failure or refusal of any person to execute and deliver to the Secretary of State for filing any document to be filed under this Chapter may petition the superior court in the county where the limited liability company’s principal office or, if none in this State, its registered office is or was last located or, if there is no such office, in the County of Wake to direct the execution and delivery to the Secretary of State for filing of the document. If the court finds that it is proper for the document to be executed and delivered to the Secretary of State for filing and there has been failure or refusal by the applicable company officials to do so, it shall order the Secretary of State to make the filing.

History.

2013-157, s. 2.

§ 57D-1-24.
Certificate of existence; certificate of authorization.

Anyone may apply to the Secretary of State for a certificate of existence for an LLC or a certificate of authorization for a foreign LLC.

A certificate of existence or authorization sets forth the following:

The limited liability company’s name and, in the case of a foreign LLC, any different name that the foreign LLC is authorized under Article 3 of Chapter 55D of the General Statutes to use to transact business in this State, as provided in the foreign LLC’s certificate of authority.

That (i) the articles of organization for the LLC have been filed and are in effect and the date on which the filed articles of organization became effective or (ii) a certificate of authority has been issued to the foreign LLC and is in effect and the date on which the certificate of authority became effective.

That the articles of organization of an LLC or the certificate of authority of a foreign LLC are not suspended under G.S. 57D-1-32(a)(or for limited liability companies formed before January 1, 2014, former G.S. 57C-1-32(a)) for failure to answer interrogatories propounded by the Secretary of State or under

G.S. 105-230

for failure to pay a tax or fee or file a report or return.

That the LLC has not been administratively dissolved under

G.S. 57D-6-06

(or for limited liability companies formed before January 1, 2014, former G.S. 57C-6-03) and no decree of judicial dissolution has been filed under

G.S. 57D-6-05

(or, for limited liability companies formed before January 1, 2014, former G.S. 57C-6-02) or, with respect to a foreign LLC, no application for a certificate of withdrawal or a certificate of revocation has been filed under Article 7 of this Chapter (or, for limited liability companies formed before January 1, 2014, former Article 7 of Chapter 57C of the General Statutes).

That, in the case of an LLC, articles of dissolution have not been filed nor have articles of merger or conversion been filed causing it to merge or convert into another entity or form of entity.

Other facts of record in the Office of the Secretary of State pertaining to the limited liability company that may be requested by the applicant.

A certificate of existence or authorization issued by the Secretary of State may be relied upon as conclusive evidence as to the accuracy of its contents.

A nonresident business solely performing disaster-related work in this State during a disaster response period at the request of a critical infrastructure company is not required to obtain a certificate of authority from the Secretary of State. The definitions and provisions of

G.S. 166A-19.70

A apply to this subsection.

History.

2013-157, s. 2; 2019-187, s. 1(c).

§§ 57D-1-25 through 57D-1-29.

Reserved for future codification purposes.